hu: Pitahaya hússzíne: Gold; Magenta; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; White; Yellow; Egyéb
sl-SI: Barva mesa pitaje: Zlata; Magenta; Oranžna; Roza; Vijoličasta; Rdeča; Bela; Rumena; Drugo
nb: Pitahaya-fruktkjøttfarge: Gull; Magenta; Oransje; Rosa; Lilla; Rød; Hvit; Gul; Annet
pt-BR: Pitaia polpa cor: Dourado; Magenta; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outros
th: สีเนื้อแก้วมังกร: สีทอง; สีบานเย็น; สีส้ม; สีชมพู; สีม่วง; สีแดง; สีขาว; สีเหลือง; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Culoarea pulpei fructului de pitahaya: Auriu; Magenta; Portocaliu; Roz; Mov; Roșu; Alb; Galben; Altele
es: Color de la pulpa de pitahaya: Oro; Magenta; Naranja; Rosa; Morado; Rojo; Blanco; Amarillo; Otro
it: Colore della polpa del pitahaya: Oro; Magenta; Arancione; Rosa; Viola; Rosso; Bianco; Giallo; Altro
sv: Pitahayans fruktköttsfärg: Guld; Magenta; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Röd; Vit; Gul; Övrigt
lt-LT: Pitajos minkštimo spalva: Auksinė; Purpurinė; Oranžinė; Rožinė; Violetinė; Raudona; Balta; Geltona; Kita
ru: Цвет мякоти питахайи: Золотой; Пурпурный; Оранжевый; Розовый; Фиолетовый; Красный; Белый; Желтый; Другое
pt-PT: Pitahaya carne cor: Dourado; Magenta; Laranja; Rosa; Roxo; Vermelho; Branco; Amarelo; Outra
nl: Pitahaya vruchtvlees kleur: Goud; Magenta; Oranje; Roze; Paars; Rood; Wit; Geel; Overig
zh-TW: 火龍果果肉顏色: 金色; 洋紅色; 橙色; 粉紅色; 紫色; 紅色; 白色; 黃色; 其他
pl: Kolor miąższu pitahai: Złoty; Magenta; Pomarańczowy; Różowy; Fioletowy; Czerwony; Biały; Żółty; Inny
bg-BG: Цвят на вътрешността на питахаята: Златист; Магента; Оранжев; Розов; Лилав; Червен; Бял; Жълт; Друго
fr: Couleur de la chair du pitahaya: Doré; Magenta; Orange; Rose; Violet; Rouge; Blanc; Jaune; Autre
el: Χρώμα σάρκας της πιτάγιας: Χρυσό; Ματζέντα; Πορτοκαλί; Ροζ; Μωβ; Κόκκινο; Λευκό; Κίτρινο; Άλλο
vi: Màu thịt quả thanh long: Màu vàng; Màu đỏ tươi; Màu cam; Màu hồng; Màu tím; Màu đỏ; Màu trắng; Màu vàng; Khác
da: Pitahayas frugtkødsfarve: Guld; Magenta; Orange; Pink; Lilla; Rød; Hvid; Gul; Andet
de: Farbe des Pitahaya-Fruchtfleischs: Gold; Magenta; Orange; Rosa; Lila; Rot; Weiß; Gelb; Andere
sk-SK: Farba dužiny dračieho ovocia: Zlatá; Magenta; Oranžová; Ružová; Fialová; Červená; Biela; Žltá; Iné
fi: Pitaian hedelmälihan väri: Kullanvärinen; Magenta; Oranssi; Vaaleanpunainen; Violetti; Punainen; Valkoinen; Keltainen; Muu
en: Pitahaya flesh color: Gold; Magenta; Orange; Pink; Purple; Red; White; Yellow; Other
cs: Barva masa pitahaye: Zlatá; Magenta; Oranžová; Růžová; Purpurová; Červená; Bílá; Žlutá; Ostatní
ko: 피타하야 과육 색상: 금색; 마젠타; 주황색; 분홍색; 보라색; 빨간색; 흰색; 노란색; 기타
zh-CN: 火龙果的果肉颜色: 金色; 洋红色; 橙色; 粉红色; 紫色; 红色; 白色; 黄色; 其他
hr-HR: Boja mesa pitaje: Zlatna; Magenta; Narančasta; Ružičasta; Ljubičasta; Crvena; Bijela; Žuta; Ostalo
tr: Pitahaya et rengi: Altın rengi; Macenta; Turuncu; Pembe; Mor; Kırmızı; Beyaz; Sarı; Diğer
ja: ピタヤの果肉の色: 金色; マゼンタ; オレンジ; ピンク; 紫; 赤; 白; 黄色; その他